Arkansas, session 2025, SB210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Require Examining of
Authoritative Documents Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(a)(1)(A), concerning the signing of
initiative and referendum petitions, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) A After reading the ballot title of the petition in the
presence of the canvasser or having the ballot title of the petition read
aloud to him or her in the presence of the canvasser, a person who is a
registered voter of this state may sign his or her own name and print his or
her own name, address, birth date, and the date of signing on an initiative
or referendum petition in his or her own proper handwriting, and not
*SSS084*
02/06/2025 9:18:51 AM SSS084

SB210
otherwise, to order an initiative or referendum vote upon a proposed
amendment or a proposed or referred act.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-9-103(c), concerning misdemeanor offenses
for a person acting as a canvasser, notary, sponsor, or agent of a sponsor,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(10) As a canvasser, knowingly accepts a signature when the
person signing the petition has not read the ballot title of the petition in
the presence of the canvasser or the ballot title of the petition has not
been read aloud to the person in the presence of the canvasser.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-9-109(a) is amended to read as follows:
(a) Each petition containing signatures shall be verified in
substantially the following form by the canvasser's affidavit thereon as a
part thereof: "State of Arkansas
County of _____________
I, (print name of canvasser), being duly sworn, state that each of the
foregoing persons signed his or her own name to this sheet of the petition in
my presence. To the best of my knowledge and belief, each signature is
genuine and each signer is a registered voter of the State of Arkansas,
_____________ County, or City or Incorporated Town of _____________. At all
times during the circulation of this signature sheet, an exact copy of the
popular name, ballot title, and text was attached to the signature sheet, and
each signer read the ballot title of the petition or had the ballot title of
the petition read to the signer in my presence. My current residence address
is correctly stated below.
Signature _____________
Current residence _____________
Indicate one: _____________ Paid Canvasser _____________
Volunteer/Unpaid Canvasser
Subscribed and sworn to before me this _____________ day of
_____________, 20_____________
Signature _____________
Clerk, Notary, Judge, or J.P.
Seal _____________”.

02/06/2025 9:18:51 AM SSS084

SB210
SECTION 5. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act
are declared to be severable and the invalidity of any provision of this act
shall not affect other provisions of the act which can be given effect
without the invalid provision.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and
determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the process
for citizens to propose initiated acts and amendments to the Arkansas
Constitution is critical to a well-functioning democracy in this state; that
it is of the utmost importance that the integrity of the initiative process
be strengthened through this act so that petitioners and voters maintain a
high degree of confidence in the soundness of their right to legislate as
citizens of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary because any
delay in the implementation of this act would disrupt the initiative process
for the 2026 general election, which would have a detrimental effect on the
public peace, health, and safety of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is
declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.











02/06/2025 9:18:51 AM SSS084